Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 359, O.S.L.
2022, as last amended by Section 2, Chapter 286, O.S.L. 2025 (70
O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 6-190.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-190.2. A. There is hereby created in the State
Treasury a revolving fund for the State Department of Education to
be designated the “Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund”. The
revolving fund shall be a continuing fund, without legislative
appropriation, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall be
under the control and management of the State Department of
Education. Expenditures from the Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund
shall be budgeted and expended as provided for in subsection B of
this section.
B. The State Department of Education shall utilize the funds
for the program:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1617 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. To support public school districts that elect to participate
in assigning advanced, lead, and master teacher certificates as
outlined in Section 6-190 of this title. Funding shall be allocated
to school districts to provide the stipend amounts indicated for
advanced, lead, and master certificates as provided for in
subsection I of Section 6-190 of this title on a first-come, first-
served basis until the cash is exhausted for the school year; and
2. To support the compensation of teachers certified in special
education as provided for in Section 13-110 of this title, subject
to the stipend amounts required by paragraph 1 of this subsection
being fully funded, until the cash is exhausted for the school year.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 13-110, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 13-110. A. Qualified and properly certified teachers
of special education shall be paid a minimum of five percent (5%)
ten percent (10%) above the prevailing wage paid teachers of
children who are nondisabled do not have disabilities in the same
public school district. Of the ten percent (10%) amount required by
this subsection, five percent (5%) shall be provided by the
employing school district, and five percent (5%) shall be provided
pursuant to subsection B of this section.
B. The State Department of Education shall allocate funds from
the Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section
6-190.2 of this title to each school district in this state to
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1617 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

impl ement the state matching fund requirement of subsection A of
this section. Funding shall be allocated to each school district to
provide the five percent (5%) amount calculated pursuant to
subsection A of this section for every teacher certified in special
education.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
February 10, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED













SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1617 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)